Hawaii statutes.
§459-3 Board of examiners; members,
appointment, qualifications. There shall be a board to be known as the
board of examiners in optometry, for the State. The board shall consist of
seven members, five of whom shall be licensed optometrists who have actually
engaged in the practice of optometry for at least five years and two of whom
shall be public members. One of the five licensed optometrist members shall be
from a county other than the city and county of Honolulu. No member of the
board shall be a stockholder, member of the faculty, or on a board of trustees
of any school of optometry. [L 1917, c 187, §2; RL 1925, §1113; RL 1935, §1371;
RL 1945, §2802; RL 1955, §68-3; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §5; HRS §459-3; am L
1978, c 208, §9; am L 1985, c 224, §3; am L 1987, c 152, §3; am L 1992, c 202,
§121; ree L 1993, c 322, §10]

Cross References

Departmental administration, see §§26-9 and 26-35.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next